District of Columbia statutes.
31-3836

Regulations.

The Commissioner shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter within 180 days after April 3, 2001.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-254, § 7, 48 DCR 723